Illinois, session 104th, HB5079.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Financial Institutions Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1205/6)7    Sec. 6. General powers and duties. In addition to the 8powers and duties provided by law and imposed elsewhere in 9this Act, the Division has the following powers and duties:10        (1) To administer and enforce the Consumer Installment 11    Loan Act and its implementing rules.12        (2) To administer and enforce the Currency Exchange 13    Act and its implementing rules.14        (3) To administer and enforce the Debt Management 15    Service Act and its implementing rules.16        (4) To administer and enforce the Debt Settlement 17    Consumer Protection Act and its implementing rules.18        (5) To administer and enforce the Illinois Development 19    Credit Corporation Act and its implementing rules.20        (6) To administer and enforce the Payday Loan Reform 21    Act and its implementing rules.22        (7) To administer and enforce the Safety Deposit 23    License Act and its implementing rules.  HB5079- 2 -LRB104 18589 JRC 32032 b1        (8) To administer and enforce the Sales Finance Agency 2    Act and its implementing rules. 3        (9) To administer and enforce the Title Insurance Act 4    and its implementing rules.5        (10) To administer and enforce the Transmitters of 6    Money Act and its implementing rules.7        (11) To administer and enforce the Predatory Loan 8    Prevention Act and its implementing rules.9        (12) To administer and enforce the Motor Vehicle 10    Retail Installment Sales Act and its implementing rules.11        (13) To administer and enforce the Retail Installment 12    Sales Act and its implementing rules.13        (14) To administer and enforce the Illinois Credit 14    Union Act and its implementing rules.15        (15) To administer and enforce the Collection Agency 16    Act and its implementing rules.17        (16) To administer and enforce the Consumer Legal 18    Funding Act and its implementing rules. 19        (17) To administer and enforce this Act and any other 20    Act administered by the Director or Division.21        (18) To authorize and administer examinations to 22    ascertain the qualifications of applicants and licensees 23    for which the examination is held.24        (19) To conduct hearings in proceedings to revoke, 25    suspend, refuse to renew, or take other disciplinary 26    action regarding licenses, charters, certifications,   HB5079- 3 -LRB104 18589 JRC 32032 b1    registrations, or authorities of persons as authorized in 2    any Act administered by the Division.3        (20) To administer and enforce the Common Interest 4    Community Association Act and the Condominium Property Act 5    on behalf of unit owners. 6    Whenever the Division is authorized or required by law to 7consider some aspect of criminal history record information 8for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 9responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 10conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 11Illinois State Police Law, the Illinois State Police is 12authorized to furnish, pursuant to positive identification, 13the information contained in State files that is necessary to 14fulfill the request. 15(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 16102-975, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-1014, eff. 178-9-24.) 18    Section 10. The Common Interest Community Association Act 19is amended by adding Section 1-95 as follows: 20    (765 ILCS 160/1-95 new)21    Sec. 1-95. State oversight authority. The Department of 22Financial and Professional Regulation is authorized to 23investigate, make findings, or make recommendations for 24enforcement on behalf of unit owners of common interest   HB5079- 4 -LRB104 18589 JRC 32032 b1community associations whose rights have been violated by the 2owners' governing board under Illinois law or under the 3board's governing documents. The Department of Financial and 4Professional Regulation may adopt rules to implement this 5Section. 6    Section 15. The Condominium Property Act is amended by 7adding Section 37 as follows: 8    (765 ILCS 605/37 new)9    Sec. 37. State oversight authority. The Department of 10Financial and Professional Regulation is authorized to 11investigate, make findings, or make recommendations for 12enforcement on behalf of unit owners of condominiums whose 13rights have been violated by the owners' governing board under 14Illinois law or under the board's governing documents. The 15Department of Financial and Professional Regulation may adopt 16rules to implement this Section. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182027.